Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 202A Hospitalization of the Mentally Ill

202A.006.
Title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Kentucky Mental Health Hospitalization Act.”

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 32, effective July 15, 1982.

202A.008.
Authority for administrative regulations.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A in order to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 498, § 20, effective July 15, 1994.

202A.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

202A.011.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authorized staff physician” means a physician who is a bona fide member of the hospital’s medical staff;

“Danger” or “threat of danger to self, family, or others” means substantial physical harm or threat of substantial physical harm upon self, family, or others, including actions which deprive self, family, or others of the basic means of survival including provision for reasonable shelter, food, or clothing;

“Cabinet” means the Kentucky Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

“Psychiatric facility” means a crisis stabilization unit or any facility licensed by the cabinet and which provides inpatient, outpatient, psychosocial rehabilitation, emergency, and consultation and education services for the diagnosis and treatment of persons who have a mental illness;

“Forensic psychiatric facility” means a mental institution or facility, or part thereof, designated by the secretary for the purpose and function of providing inpatient evaluation, care, and treatment for mentally ill persons or individuals with an intellectual disability, who have been charged with or convicted of a felony;

“Hospital” means:

A state mental hospital or institution or other licensed public or private hospital, institution, health-care facility, or part thereof, approved by the Kentucky Cabinet for Health and Family Services as equipped to provide full-time residential care and treatment for mentally ill persons or individuals with an intellectual disability; or

A hospital, institution, or health-care facility of the government of the United States equipped to provide residential care and treatment for mentally ill persons or individuals with an intellectual disability;

“Judge” means any judge or justice of the Court of Justice or a trial commissioner of the District Court acting under authority of SCR 5.030;

“Least restrictive alternative mode of treatment” means that treatment which will give a mentally ill individual a realistic opportunity to improve the individual’s level of functioning, consistent with accepted professional practice in the least confining setting available;

“Mentally ill person” means a person with substantially impaired capacity to use self-control, judgment, or discretion in the conduct of the person’s affairs and social relations, associated with maladaptive behavior or recognized emotional symptoms where impaired capacity, maladaptive behavior, or emotional symptoms can be related to physiological, psychological, or social factors;

“Patient” means a person under observation, care, or treatment in a hospital pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

“Petitioner” means a person who institutes a proceeding under this chapter;

“Qualified mental health professional” means:

A physician licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while engaged in the performance of official duties;

A psychiatrist licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while engaged in the practice of official duties, who is certified or eligible to apply for certification by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.;

A psychologist with the health service provider designation, a psychological practitioner, a certified psychologist, or a psychological associate, licensed under the provisions of KRS Chapter 319;

A licensed registered nurse with a master’s degree in psychiatric nursing from an accredited institution and two (2) years of clinical experience with mentally ill persons, or a licensed registered nurse, with a bachelor’s degree in nursing from an accredited institution, who is certified as a psychiatric and mental health nurse by the American Nurses Association and who has three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in psychiatric nursing and is currently employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision of mental health services or a regional community program for mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability;

A licensed clinical social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS 335.100, or a certified social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS 335.080 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in psychiatric social work and currently employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision of mental health services or a regional community program for mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability;

A marriage and family therapist licensed under the provisions of KRS 335.300 to 335.399 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in psychiatric mental health practice and currently employed by a hospital or forensic facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a psychiatric unit of a general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing mental health services, or a regional community program for mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability;

A professional counselor credentialed under the provisions of KRS Chapter 335.500 to 335.599 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in psychiatric mental health practice and currently employed by a hospital or forensic facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a psychiatric unit of a general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing mental health services, or a regional community program for mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability; or

A physician assistant licensed under KRS 311.840 to 311.862, who meets one (1) of the following requirements:

Provides documentation that he or she has completed a psychiatric residency program for physician assistants;

Has completed at least one thousand (1,000) hours of clinical experience under a supervising physician, as defined by KRS 311.840, who is a psychiatrist and is certified or eligible for certification by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.;

Holds a master’s degree from a physician assistant program accredited by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the Physician Assistant or its predecessor or successor agencies, is practicing under a supervising physician as defined by KRS 311.840, and:

Has two (2) years of clinical experience in the assessment, evaluation, and treatment of mental disorders; or

Has been employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision of mental health services or a regional community program for mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability for at least two (2) years; or

Holds a bachelor’s degree, possesses a current physician assistant certificate issued by the board prior to July 15, 2002, is practicing under a supervising physician as defined by KRS 311.840, and:

Has three (3) years of clinical experience in the assessment, evaluation, and treatment of mental disorders; or

Has been employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision of mental health services or a regional community program for mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability for at least three (3) years;

“Residence” means legal residence as determined by applicable principles governing conflicts of law;

“Respondent” means a person alleged in a hearing under this chapter to be a mentally ill person or an individual with an intellectual disability; and

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 1, effective July 1, 1982; 1988, ch. 139, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 498, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 369, § 19, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 177, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 99, § 1, effective March 28, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 212, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 146, § 32, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 165, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

202A.012.
Application of KRS Chapter 202A.

This chapter shall not apply to persons under eighteen (18) years of age unless specifically authorized by the Kentucky Unified Juvenile Code.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 184, effective July 1, 1987.

202A.014.
Jurisdiction.

All proceedings for the involuntary hospitalization of mentally ill persons shall be initiated in the District Court of the county where the person to be hospitalized resides or in which he may be at the time of the filing of a petition.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 3, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.016.
Duty of county attorney.

In all proceedings under this chapter, it shall be the duty of the county attorney to assist the petitioner and represent the interest of the Commonwealth and to assist the court in its inquiry by the presentation of evidence.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 18, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.020.
Voluntary admission to hospital — Application — Discharge — Release. [Repealed.]

202A.021.
Hospitalization of minors — Admission or discharge of voluntary patients — Transport of voluntary patients to receiving hospital or psychiatric facility.

The hospitalization of minors alleged to be mentally ill, except those provided for in KRS Chapter 640, shall be governed by KRS Chapter 645.

An authorized staff physician of a hospital may admit for observation, diagnosis, care and treatment any person who is mentally ill or who has symptoms of mental illness and who applies voluntarily therefor.

An authorized staff physician of a hospital shall discharge any voluntary patient who has recovered or whose hospitalization the staff physician determines to be no longer necessary or advisable.

A voluntary patient shall be released upon the patient’s written request unless further detained under the applicable provisions of this chapter, including subsection (5) of this section.

A voluntary patient who presents or is admitted to a hospital with symptoms of mental illness may be transported from the originating hospital to a receiving hospital or psychiatric facility:
(5) (a)

A voluntary patient who presents or is admitted to a hospital with symptoms of mental illness may be transported from the originating hospital to a receiving hospital or psychiatric facility:

Upon the order of an authorized staff physician of an originating hospital and an authorized staff physician of a receiving hospital or psychiatric facility; and

Submission of the patient’s signed written agreement to be voluntarily transported.

If the agreed-upon transport from the originating hospital has been initiated, the patient with a signed written agreement to be voluntarily transported under this subsection shall not be physically released upon his or her request during the transport to the receiving hospital or psychiatric facility. The patient shall be physically released upon request after the patient has been received by the receiving hospital or psychiatric facility upon the patient’s written release request unless further detained under the applicable provisions of this chapter as provided for under subsection (4) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 2, effective July 1, 1982; 1986, ch. 423, § 195, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 139, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 2021 ch. 32, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

202A.026.
Criteria for involuntary hospitalization.

No person shall be involuntarily hospitalized unless such person is a mentally ill person:

Who presents a danger or threat of danger to self, family or others as a result of the mental illness;

Who can reasonably benefit from treatment; and

For whom hospitalization is the least restrictive alternative mode of treatment presently available.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 4, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.028.
Hospitalization by court order — Transportation — Release.

Following an examination by a qualified mental health professional and a certification by that professional that the person meets the criteria for involuntary hospitalization, a judge may order the person hospitalized for a period not to exceed seventy-two (72) hours, excluding weekends and holidays. For the purposes of this section, the qualified mental health professional shall be:

A staff member of a regional community program for mental health or individuals with an intellectual disability;

An individual qualified and licensed to perform the examination through the use of telehealth services; or

The psychiatrist ordered, subject to the court’s discretion, to perform the required examination.

Any person who has been admitted to a hospital under subsection (1) of this section shall be released from the hospital within seventy-two (72) hours, excluding weekends and holidays, unless further held under the applicable provisions of this chapter.

Any person admitted to a hospital under subsection (1) of this section or transferred to a hospital while ordered hospitalized under subsection (1) of this section shall be transported from the person’s home county by the sheriff of that county or other peace officer as ordered by the court. The sheriff or other peace officer may, upon agreement of a person authorized by the peace officer, authorize the cabinet, a private agency on contract with the cabinet, or an ambulance service designated by the cabinet to transport the person to the hospital. The transportation costs of the sheriff, other peace officer, ambulance service, or other private agency on contract with the cabinet shall be paid by the cabinet in accordance with an administrative regulation promulgated by the cabinet, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

Any person released from the hospital under subsection (2) of this section shall be transported to the person’s county of discharge by a sheriff or other peace officer, by an ambulance service designated by the cabinet, or by other appropriate means of transportation which is consistent with the treatment plan of that person. The transportation cost of transporting the patient to the patient’s county of discharge when performed by a peace officer, ambulance service, or other private agency on contract with the cabinet shall be paid by the cabinet in accordance with an administrative regulation issued by the cabinet pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

No person who has been held under subsection (1) of this section shall be held in jail pending evaluation and transportation to the hospital.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 139, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 498, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 487, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2012, ch. 146, § 33, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 61, § 2, effective June 24, 2015.

202A.030.
Involuntary admission to hospital without court order. [Repealed.]

202A.031.
Seventy-two-hour emergency admission.

An authorized staff physician may order the admission of any person who is present at, or is presented at, a hospital. For the purposes of this subsection only, a hospital may include any acute care hospital that is licensed by the Commonwealth. Within twenty-four (24) hours (excluding weekends and holidays) of the admission under this section, the authorized staff physician ordering the admission of the individual shall certify in the record of the individual that in his opinion the individual should be involuntarily hospitalized.

Any individual who has been admitted to a hospital under subsection (1) of this section shall be released from the hospital within seventy-two (72) hours (excluding weekends and holidays) unless further detained under the applicable provisions of this chapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 5, effective July 1, 1982; 2004, ch. 139, § 1, effective July 13, 2004.

202A.040.
Detention of suspected mentally ill person without warrant. [Repealed.]

202A.041.
Warrantless arrest and subsequent proceedings.

Any peace officer who has reasonable grounds to believe that an individual is mentally ill and presents a danger or threat of danger to self, family, or others if not restrained shall take the individual into custody and transport the individual without unnecessary delay to a hospital or psychiatric facility designated by the cabinet for the purpose of an evaluation to be conducted by a qualified mental health professional. Upon transport of the person to the hospital or psychiatric facility, the peace officer shall provide written documentation which describes the behavior of the person which caused the peace officer to take the person into custody. If, after evaluation, the qualified mental health professional finds that the person does not meet the criteria for involuntary hospitalization, the person shall be released immediately and transported back to the person’s home county by an appropriate means of transportation as provided in KRS 202A.101. If, after evaluation, the qualified mental health professional finds that the person meets the criteria for involuntary hospitalization, appropriate proceedings under this chapter shall be initiated. The person may be held pending certification by a qualified mental health professional and implementation of procedures as provided in KRS 202A.028, 202A.031, or 202A.051 for a period not to exceed eighteen (18) hours.

If, after the evaluation, the qualified mental health professional finds that the person does not meet the criteria for involuntary hospitalization and the peace officer has probable cause to believe that the person has committed a criminal offense, the peace officer may swear out a warrant and take the arrested person without unnecessary delay before a judge.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 6, effective July 1, 1982; 1988, ch. 139, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 498, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

202A.050.
Restraining complaint — Warrant — Examination — Commitment — Hearing. [Repealed.]

202A.051.
Proceedings for 60-day and 360-day involuntary hospitalizations — Petition contents.

Proceedings for sixty (60) days or three hundred sixty (360) days of involuntary hospitalization of an individual shall be initiated by the filing of a verified petition in District Court.

The petition and all subsequent court documents shall be entitled: “In the interest of (name of respondent).”

The petition shall be filed by a qualified mental health professional, peace officer, county attorney, Commonwealth’s attorney, spouse, relative, friend, or guardian of the individual concerning whom the petition is filed, or any other interested person.

The petition shall set forth:

Petitioner’s relationship to the respondent;

Respondent’s name, residence, and current location, if known;

The name and residence of respondent’s parents, if living and if known, or respondent’s legal guardian, if any and if known;

The name and residence of respondent’s husband or wife, if any and if known;

The name and residence of the person having custody of the respondent, if any, or if no such person is known, the name and residence of a near relative or that the person is unknown;

Petitioner’s belief, including the factual basis therefor, that the respondent is mentally ill and presents a danger or threat of danger to self, family or others if not restrained; and

If the petition seeks a three hundred sixty (360) day involuntary hospitalization of the respondent, the petition shall further set forth that the respondent has been hospitalized in a hospital or a forensic psychiatric facility for a period of thirty (30) days under the provisions of this chapter or KRS Chapter 504 within the preceding six (6) months.

Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall examine the petitioner under oath as to the contents of the petition. If the petitioner is a qualified mental health professional, the court may dispense with the examination.

If after reviewing the allegations contained in the petition and examining the petitioner under oath, it appears to the court that there is probable cause to believe the respondent should be involuntarily hospitalized, the court shall, unless either the court or one (1) of the parties objects, implement the procedures provided in KRS 202A.028 and order the individual to be examined without unnecessary delay by a qualified mental health professional. If the person is not being held under the provisions of this chapter, the court may order that the sheriff of the county or other peace officer transport the person to a hospital or psychiatric facility designated by the cabinet for the purpose of the evaluation. The sheriff or other peace officer may, upon agreement of a person authorized by the peace officer, authorize the cabinet, a private agency on contract with the cabinet, or an ambulance service designated by the cabinet to transport the person to a hospital or psychiatric facility. Following that, the procedures as set forth in KRS 202A.028 shall be carried out. Otherwise, the court shall:

Set a date for a preliminary hearing within six (6) days from the date of holding the person under the provisions of this section (excluding holidays and weekends) to determine if there is probable cause to believe the person should be involuntarily hospitalized;

Notify the respondent, the legal guardian, if any, and if known, and the spouse, parents, or nearest relative or friend of the respondent concerning the allegations and contents of the petition and the date and purpose of the preliminary hearing; and the name, address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent the respondent; and

Cause the respondent to be examined without unnecessary delay by two (2) qualified mental health professionals, at least one (1) of whom is a physician. The qualified mental health professionals shall certify within twenty-four (24) hours (excluding weekends and holidays) their findings.

If the respondent is being presently held under the provisions of this chapter, the court may order further holding of the respondent to accomplish the examination ordered by the court.
(7) (a)

If the respondent is being presently held under the provisions of this chapter, the court may order further holding of the respondent to accomplish the examination ordered by the court.

If the respondent is not being presently held under the provisions of this chapter, the court may order that the sheriff of the county or a peace officer transport the respondent to a hospital or a psychiatric facility designated by the cabinet so that the respondent shall be examined without unnecessary delay by two (2) qualified mental health professionals, at least one (1) of whom is a physician. The sheriff or other peace officer may authorize, upon agreement of a person authorized by the peace officer, the cabinet, a private agency on contract with the cabinet, or an ambulance service designated by the cabinet to transport the person to a hospital or psychiatric facility.

When the court is authorized to issue an order that the respondent be transported to a hospital or psychiatric facility, the court may, in its discretion, issue a summons. A summons so issued shall be directed to the respondent, shall command the respondent to appear at a time and place therein specified where the respondent shall be there examined by two (2) qualified mental health professionals, at least one (1) of whom is a physician, and shall command the respondent’s appearance at the preliminary hearing. If a respondent who has been summoned fails to appear for such examination or at the preliminary hearing, the court may order that the sheriff of the county or a peace officer transport the respondent to a hospital or psychiatric facility designated by the cabinet for the purpose of an evaluation.

If upon completion of the preliminary hearing, the court finds there is probable cause to believe the respondent should be involuntarily hospitalized, the court shall order a final hearing within twenty-one (21) days from the date of holding the respondent under the provisions of this section to determine if the respondent should be involuntarily hospitalized.

If the court finds there is no probable cause, the proceedings against the respondent shall be dismissed, and the respondent shall be released from any holding.

If upon completion of the final hearing, the court finds the respondent should be involuntarily hospitalized, the court shall order the respondent hospitalized in a hospital for a period not to exceed sixty (60) consecutive days from the date of the court order or a period not to exceed three hundred sixty (360) consecutive days from the date of the court order, whatever was the period of time that was requested in the petition.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 7, effective July 1, 1982; 1988, ch. 139, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 498, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

202A.053.
Venue.

A respondent who has been ordered involuntarily hospitalized following the preliminary hearing shall have venue for all subsequent proceedings, including the final hearing, transferred to the court of the county where the respondent is hospitalized.

The court of the county where the preliminary hearing was held may, upon its own motion, or shall, upon motion of one (1) of the parties, retain venue over proceedings subsequent to the preliminary hearing.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 139, § 6, effective July 15, 1988.

202A.056.
Certificate contents — Fee.

The certificate referred to in this chapter shall be in the form prescribed by the cabinet. The certificate shall state that the respondent has been examined by each of the qualified mental health professionals making the certificate within twenty-four (24) hours (excluding weekends and holidays) prior to the date of the certificate. It shall state the facts and circumstances upon which the judgment of the examining physician is based and shall be sworn to before a notary or the clerk or judge of the court.

The examiner shall be entitled to a fee for such examination and certification, to be paid by the county in which the petition is filed, upon a certified copy of an order of allowance made by the court holding the hearing.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 19, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.060.
Court determination of mental condition. [Repealed.]

202A.061.
Two certifications required.

In any proceeding for involuntary hospitalization under the applicable provisions of this chapter, if the criteria for involuntary hospitalization are not certified by at least two (2) examining qualified mental health professionals, the court shall, without taking any further action, terminate the proceedings and order the release of the person. The qualified mental health professionals shall certify to the court within twenty-four (24) hours (excluding weekends and holidays) of the examination, their findings and opinions as to whether the person shall be involuntarily hospitalized.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 9, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.066.
Qualified mental health professional retained by respondent.

A qualified mental health professional retained by the respondent shall be permitted to witness and participate in any examination of the respondent.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 13, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.070.
Proceedings for 60-day involuntary hospitalization. [Repealed.]

202A.071.
Timing of preliminary and final hearings.

The preliminary hearing shall be held not later than six (6) days (excluding weekends and holidays) from the time of respondent’s holding under these proceedings. If the respondent is not held under these proceedings, the preliminary hearing shall be held not later than six (6) days (excluding weekends and holidays) from the time of the examination of the respondent.

The final hearing shall be held within twenty-one (21) days of the date of the holding or from the date of the examination, if not held.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 11, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 362, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 498, § 5, effective July 15, 1994.

202A.076.
Conduct of hearings.

The preliminary hearing need not be formal and may include the receiving of the qualified mental health professionals’ reports as evidence. The hearing may be held by the court in chambers, at a hospital, or other suitable place. The respondent shall be afforded an opportunity to testify, to present, and cross-examine witnesses who appear and testify against him. The court may exclude all persons not necessary for the conduct of the hearing. The respondent and his attorney may waive respondent’s right to a preliminary hearing.

The final hearing may be conducted in an informal manner, consistent with orderly procedures, and in a physical setting not likely to have a harmful effect on the mental or physical health of the respondent. The hearing may be held by the court in chambers, at a hospital, or other suitable place. The respondent shall be afforded an opportunity to testify, to present, and cross-examine witnesses against him. The manner of proceeding and rules of evidence shall be the same as those in any criminal proceeding including the burden of proof beyond a reasonable doubt. Proceedings shall be heard by a judge unless a party requests a jury trial. Neither the respondent nor the respondent’s attorney may waive the respondent’s right to a final hearing.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 14, effective July 1, 1982; 1988, ch. 139, § 7, effective July 15, 1988.

202A.080.
Proceedings for 360-day involuntary hospitalization. [Repealed.]

202A.081.
Court-ordered community-based outpatient treatment.

Following the preliminary hearing but prior to the completion of the final hearing, the court may order the person held in a hospital approved by the cabinet for such purpose for the committing judicial district, or released, upon application and agreement of the parties, for the purpose of community-based outpatient treatment. No person held under this section shall be held in jail unless criminal charges are also pending.

A hospital shall discharge a patient there held and notify the court and attorneys of record if any authorized staff physician determines that the patient no longer meets the criteria for involuntary hospitalization.

If a patient is discharged by the hospital pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, then the proceedings against the patient shall be dismissed.

The release of the person pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of community-based outpatient treatment does not terminate the proceedings against the person, and the court ordering such release may order the immediate holding of the person at any time with or without notice if the court believes from an affidavit filed with the court that it is to the best interest of the person or others that the person be held pending the final hearing, which shall be held within twenty-one (21) days of the person’s further holding.

If the person is released pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of community-based outpatient treatment, the final hearing may be continued for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days if a provider of outpatient care accepts the respondent for specified outpatient treatment. Community-based outpatient treatment may be ordered for an additional period not to exceed sixty (60) days upon application and agreement of the parties.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 10, effective July 1, 1982; 1988, ch. 139, § 8, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 498, § 6, effective July 15, 1994.

202A.0811.
Petition for hearing regarding court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment.

Proceedings for court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment of a person shall be initiated by the filing of a verified petition for that purpose in District Court.

The petition and all subsequent court documents shall be entitled: “In the interest of (name of respondent).”

The petition shall be filed by a qualified mental health professional; peace officer; county attorney; Commonwealth’s attorney; spouse, relative, friend, or guardian of the person concerning whom the petition is filed; or any other interested person.

The petition shall set forth:

Petitioner’s relationship to the respondent;

Respondent’s name, residence, and current location, if known;

Petitioner’s belief, including the factual basis therefor, that the respondent meets the criteria for court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment as set forth in KRS 202A.0817; and

Whether, within five (5) days prior to the filing of the petition, the respondent has been examined by a qualified mental health professional to determine whether the respondent meets the criteria for court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment pursuant to KRS 202A.0815.

Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall examine the petitioner under oath as to the contents of the petition. If the petitioner is a qualified mental health professional, the court may dispense with the examination.

If, after reviewing the allegations contained in the petition and examining the petitioner under oath, it appears to the court that there is probable cause to believe the respondent should be court-ordered to assisted outpatient treatment, the court shall:

Order the respondent to be examined without unnecessary delay by a qualified mental health professional to determine whether the respondent meets the criteria for court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment set forth in KRS 202A.0815, unless the court has already received the certified findings of such an examination conducted no earlier than five (5) days prior to the filing of the petition. The qualified mental health professional shall certify his or her findings within seventy-two (72) hours, excluding weekends and holidays; and

Set a date for a hearing within six (6) days from the date of the examination under the provisions of this section, excluding weekends and holidays, to determine if the respondent should be court-ordered to assisted outpatient treatment.

If the court finds there is no probable cause to believe the respondent should be court-ordered to assisted outpatient treatment, the proceedings against the respondent shall be dismissed.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 154, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

202A.0813.
Transportation and examination of petition respondent.

The court may order that the sheriff of the county or a peace officer transport the respondent to a hospital or site designated by the cabinet so that the respondent shall be examined without unnecessary delay by a qualified mental health professional. The sheriff or peace officer may authorize, upon agreement of a person authorized by the peace officer, the cabinet, a private agency on contract with the cabinet, or an ambulance service designated by the cabinet to transport the person to a hospital or site designated by the cabinet.

When the court is authorized to issue an order that the respondent be transported to a hospital or site designated by the cabinet for examination, the court may issue a summons.
(2) (a)

When the court is authorized to issue an order that the respondent be transported to a hospital or site designated by the cabinet for examination, the court may issue a summons.

A summons so issued shall be directed to the respondent and shall command the respondent to appear at a time and place specified in the summons, where the respondent shall be examined by a qualified mental health professional.

If a respondent who has been summoned fails to appear for the examination, the court may order that the sheriff of the county or a peace officer transport the respondent to a hospital or site designated by the cabinet for the purpose of an examination.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 154, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

202A.0815.
Criteria for court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment.

No person shall be court-ordered to assisted outpatient mental health treatment unless the person:

Has been involuntarily hospitalized pursuant to KRS 202A.051 at least two (2) times in the past twenty-four (24) months;

Is diagnosed with a serious mental illness;

Is unlikely to adequately adhere to outpatient treatment on a voluntary basis based on a qualified mental health professional’s:

Clinical observation;

Review of treatment history, including the person’s prior history of repeated treatment nonadherence; and

Identification of specific characteristics of the person’s clinical condition described as anosognosia, or failure to recognize his or her diagnosis of serious mental illness; and

Is in need of court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment as the least restrictive alternative mode of treatment presently available and appropriate.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 154, § 5, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 29, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

202A.0817.
Treatment plan required for court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment.

No later than the date of the hearing held pursuant to KRS 202A.0811, the qualified mental health professional who examined the respondent pursuant to KRS 202A.0811 shall provide to the court and the respondent a proposed written treatment plan for the respondent for court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment, which shall have the goal of recovery. In developing a treatment plan, a qualified mental health professional shall:

Provide reasonable opportunities for the respondent to actively participate in the development of the treatment plan and any modifications thereafter, and involve any other persons whom the respondent requests to have participate;

Follow any advanced directive for mental health treatment executed by the respondent; and

Include in the treatment plan:

A proactive crisis plan that includes access to emergency or crisis services twenty-four (24) hours a day and the contact information to access such crisis services; and

Evidence-based practices. As used in this paragraph, “evidence-based practices” means intervention programs, policies, procedures, and practices that have been rigorously tested; are proven by scientific research; have yielded consistent, replicable results; and have proven safe, beneficial, and effective for most people diagnosed with mental illness when implemented competently. Evidence-based practices may include but are not limited to psychotropic medications, psychosocial rehabilitation, recovery-oriented therapies, assertive community treatment, supported employment, supported housing, and peer support services.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 154, § 6, effective June 29, 2017.